src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
similar_to: KÅHTT
* Yaml: **N-taehtt**
* +Use/NG+Err/Orth:%^PAL E-STEM_SG-NOM ;   (1) Sg.Nom: käʹhcc
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2VX E-STEM_SG-NOM ;   (1) Sg.Nom: kääuʹc
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2VX E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;    (2) Pl.Nom: kääuʹc
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2VX PL-NOM ;    (2) Pl.Nom: kääuʹc
* : E-STEM_SG-ILL ;    (3) Sg.Ill: tähtta
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2VX%>e SG-LOC ;    (4) Sg.Loc: kääuʹcest
* :%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^YXX2VX SG-COM_IN ;    (5) Sg.Com: kääuʹcin
* :%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^YXX2VX E-STEM_PL-OBL ;    (5) Sg.Com: kääuʹcin
* :%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ;    (6) Ess: täʹhtten
* :%^V2VV%^PALNo%^YXX2VX E-STEM_N_KUYLAZH ;    !(9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: tääutaž

* LEXICON N_RUQHSS  ruʹhss:ruhss
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (NO vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
Lowered: ELSE
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
NumContLex="1.113
Is for nouns with *-est* Loc, Extra long vowel
* Yaml: **N-kerjj**
* :%^PAL E-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    			 (1) ruʹhss
* :%^PAL%^YXX2VX E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;  (3) ruuʹs
* :%^PAL%^YXX2VX PL-NOM ;  (3) ruuʹs
* :%^VOWLower E-STEM_SG-ILL ;		      	 (3) rohssa
* :%^PAL%^YXX2VX%>e SG-LOC ;		 (4) ruuʹsest
* :%^PAL%^YXX2VX SG-COM_IN ;	 (5) ruuʹsin
* :%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; 			 	 (6) ruʹhssen
* :%^PAL%^YXX2VX E-STEM_PL-OBL ;	 (5) ruuʹsin
* :%^V2VV%^VOWLower%^YXX2VX E-STEM_N_KUYLAZH ;  (9) roousaž
*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) ruhss-
* :%^VV2V%^PAL%^YXX2VX E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) ruʹs-
* :%^PAL  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) ruʹhss Ess+Px..

* LEXICON N_1E_VUQCC  jäuʹrr:jä%^1VOWu%{ʹØ%}rr
* LEXICON N_JAEUQRR  jäuʹrr:jä%^1VOWu%{ʹØ%}rr
similar_to: N_AUTT
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (NO vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
Lowered: ELSE
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
Is for nouns with *-est* Loc, Extra long vowel
* Yaml: **N-jaurr**
*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) jäurr
* :%^VV2V%^PAL%^YXX2YX E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) jäuʹr 
* :%^PAL  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) jäuʹrr Ess+Px..

* jäuʹrr #  examples:*
* *jäuʹrr:* `jäuʹrr+N+Sg+Nom`
* *jääuʹr:* `jäuʹrr+N+Sg+Gen`
* *jääuʹr:* `jäuʹrr+N+Sg+Acc`
* *jäurra:* `jäuʹrr+N+Sg+Ill`
* *jääuʹrest:* `jäuʹrr+N+Sg+Loc`
* *jäuʹrstan:* `jäuʹrr+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1`
* *jääuʹrstan:* `jäuʹrr+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1`
* *jaauʹrin:* `jäuʹrr+N+Sg+Com`
* *jäuʹrren:* `jäuʹrr+N+Ess`
* *jäuʹrred:* `jäuʹrr+N+Par`
* *jääuʹrtaa:* `jäuʹrr+N+Sg+Abe`
* *jääuʹr:* `jäuʹrr+N+Pl+Nom`
* *jaauʹri:* `jäuʹrr+N+Pl+Gen`
* *jaauʹrid:* `jäuʹrr+N+Pl+Acc`
* *jaauʹrid:* `jäuʹrr+N+Pl+Ill`
* *jaauʹrin:* `jäuʹrr+N+Pl+Loc`
* *jaauʹrivuiʹm:* `jäuʹrr+N+Pl+Com`
* *jaauʹritaa:* `jäuʹrr+N+Pl+Abe`
* *jääuraž:* `jäuʹrr+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom`
* *jääura:* `jäuʹrr+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen`

* LEXICON N_NEIQBB  jäuʹrr:jäurr
similar_to: N_AUTT
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (NO vowel shift)
Raised or lowered: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
Lowered: ELSE
between _PEIQVV and _JAEUQRR
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
Is for nouns with *-est* Loc, Extra long vowel
* Yaml: **N-jaurr**
*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) nẹibb
* :%^VV2V%^PAL%^YXX2YX E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) neiʹb 
* :%^PAL  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) neiʹbb Ess+Px..

* LEXICON N_1E_EUQKK  teiʹǧǧ:tẹ%^1VOWi%{ʹØ%}gg
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (no vowel shift, all lowered)
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster variation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
* Yaml: **N-peivv**
* :%^PAL%^PALK E-STEM_SG-NOM ;	     (1) Sg.Nom: teiʹǧǧ
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX%^PALK E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;  (2) Pl.Nom: peeiʼv
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX%^PALK PL-NOM ;  (2) Pl.Nom: teeiʼǧ
* : E-STEM_SG-ILL ;		       (3) Sg.Ill: tẹigga
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX%^PALK%>e SG-LOC ;	       (4) Sg.Loc: teeiʹǧest
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX%^PALK SG-COM_IN ;	       (5) Sg.Com: teeiʹǧin
* :%^PAL%^PALK%>e ESS/PAR ; 		   (6) Ess: peiʹvven
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX%^PALK E-STEM_PL-OBL ;  (8) Pl.Acc: peeiʹvid
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX E-STEM_N_KUYLAZH ;  (9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: pẹẹivaž
*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) pẹivv-
* :%^PAL%^YXX2YX%^PALK E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) peiʹv-
* :%^PAL%^PALK  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) peiʹvv Ess+Px..

* LEXICON N_1E_EUQCC  peiʹvv:pẹ%^1VOWi%{ʹØ%}vv cf neiʹbb
* LEXICON N_PEIQVV  peiʹvv:pẹ%^1VOWi%{ʹØ%}vv
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (no vowel shift, all lowered)
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster variation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
* Yaml: **N-peivv**
* :%^PAL E-STEM_SG-NOM ;	     (1) Sg.Nom: peiʹvv
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;  (2) Pl.Nom: peeiʼv
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX PL-NOM ;  (2) Pl.Nom: peeiʼv
* : E-STEM_SG-ILL ;		       (3) Sg.Ill: pẹivva
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX%>e SG-LOC ;	       (4) Sg.Loc: peeiʹvest
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX SG-COM_IN ;	       (5) Sg.Com: peeiʹvin
* :%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; 		   (6) Ess: peiʹvven
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX E-STEM_PL-OBL ;  (8) Pl.Acc: peeiʹvid
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX E-STEM_N_KUYLAZH ;  (9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: pẹẹivaž
*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) pẹivv-
* :%^PAL%^YXX2YX E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) peiʹv-
* :%^PAL  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) peiʹvv Ess+Px..

* +Cmp/SgNom:%^PAL R ;	 (1) Sg.Nom: peiʹvv
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX PL-NOM ;  (2) Pl.Nom: peeiʼv
* :%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; 		   (6) Ess: peiʹvven
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX PL-OBL ;  (8) Pl.Acc: peeiʹvid

* LEXICON N_PIEAQSS  pieʹss:peäss
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180, 197-199)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
Raised: ELSE
Lowered: Sg.Ill
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Diphthong + Consonant Geminate variation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
## (8) Pl.Acc: pieʹzzid
* Yaml: **N-piess, N-kjiechch**

*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) peäss-
* :%^PAL%^KK2GAllegro E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) piẹʹz-
* :%^PAL%^CC2CCC  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) peäʹsˈs Ess+Px..

* LEXICON N_1E_IEAQKK  lieʹǩǩ:leä%{ʹØ%}kk
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180, 197-199)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
Raised: ELSE
Lowered: Sg.Ill
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Diphthong + Consonant Geminate variation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
## (8) Pl.Acc: pieʹzzid
* Yaml: **N-piess, N-kjiechch**

*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) peäss-
* :%^PAL%^KK2GAllegro%^PALK  E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) piẹʹz-
* :%^PAL%^CC2CCC%^PALK   E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) peäʹsˈs Ess+Px..

* LEXICON N_SUEAQKHKH  sueʹǩǩ:suä%{ʹØ%}kk
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
Lowered: ELSE  ẹ, ä
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
NumContLex="1.113"
* Yaml: **N-suekkj**

*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) suäkk-
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^Allegro%^PAL%^KK2GAllegro%^PALK E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) suẹˈʹj-
* :%^PAL%^CC2CCC%^PALK  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) suäʹǩˈǩ Ess+Px..

* LEXICON N_KUEAQTT  kuẹʹtt:kuätt
similar_to: N_SUEAQKHKH
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
Lowered: ELSE  ẹ, ä
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
NumContLex="1.113"
* Yaml: **N-kuett**
* There are several stem types
*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) kuätt-
* :%^PAL%^CC2C E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) kuẹʹđ-
* :%^PAL%^CC2CCC  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) kuäʹtˈt- Ess+Px..

* LEXICON N_NUEAQJJ  nuẹʹjj:nuäjj
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
Lowered: ELSE  ẹ, ä
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
NumContLex="1.113"
* Yaml: **N-nuejj**
similar_to: N_KHIOJJ, N_TUYJJ, N_SUEQJJ

* LEXICON N_VIEQMM  vieʹmm:veâmm
similar_to: N_SUEAQKHKH
## FORMS
NumContLex="1.113"
* Yaml: **N-vieqmm**
* There are several stem types
*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) veâmm-
* :%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) vieʹm-
* :%^PALE%^PAL%CC2CCC  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) vieʹmˈm Ess+Px..
